Utah statutes.
73-2-28.    Costs and fees in civil actions.

The prevailing party in a civil action is entitled to collect reasonable costs and attorney fees, if that action is brought:

(1)  under Section 73-1-14;

(2)  under Section 73-1-15;

(3)  for injuries caused by a diversion of water for which no water right has been established;

(4)  for injuries caused by a diversion of water in violation of an existing water right; or

(5)  for injuries caused by a violation of a written distribution order from the state engineer.

